California statutes. Vehicle Code
For each application to include an additional operating area or a registration issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of Division 3, the department shall require a deposit in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient to ensure compliance with that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.5.

For each application for immediate telephone service for a registration issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of Division 3, the department shall impose a fee in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient to cover its administrative costs under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9260.

(a) The fee for a temporary registration issued under Section 4004 is one-quarter of the annual fees in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for the period that the vehicle is to be operated in this state.

(b) The fee for a trip permit issued under Section 4004 is forty-five dollars ($45) for each commercial motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 47.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.

(a) A service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid for an identification plate issued pursuant to Section 5014. Publicly owned special construction equipment, cemetery equipment, special mobile equipment, logging vehicles, and implements of husbandry are exempt from the service charge.

(b) A service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid for an identification plate issued pursuant to Section 5016.5.

(c) Upon application for the transfer of interest of an owner in a piece of equipment, vehicle, or implement of husbandry identified pursuant to Section 5014, the transferee shall pay a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(d) A fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid upon the renewal of an identification plate issued pursuant to Section 5014 or 5016.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.1.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2008, the fee described in Section 9261, as adjusted pursuant to Section 1678, shall be increased by five dollars ($5).

(b) Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) of the increase shall be deposited into the Alternative and Renewable Fuel and Vehicle Technology Fund created by Section 44273 of the Health and Safety Code, and two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be deposited into the Air Quality Improvement Fund created by Section 44274.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2035, and, as of January 1, 2036, is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 319, Sec. 13.   (AB 126)   Effective October 7, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

(a) The fee for a license issued to dealers and lessor-retailers is as follows:

(1) For the original license, or an ownership change which requires a new application, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).

(2) For the
 annual renewal of a license, a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(3) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a firm name change, address change, change in the corporate officer structure, or the addition of a branch location, a fee of seventy dollars ($70).

(b) The fee for a license issued to dismantlers, manufacturers, manufacturer branches, remanufacturers, remanufacturer branches, transporters, distributors, and distributor branches is as follows:

(1) For the original license, or an ownership change which requires a new application, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For the annual renewal of a license, a fee of eighty-five dollars ($85).

(3) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a firm name change, address change, or the addition of a branch location, a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(4) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a change in the corporate officer structure, a fee of seventy dollars ($70).

(c) The fee for a license issued to representatives is as follows:

(1) For the original license, or an ownership change which requires a new application, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For the annual renewal of a license, a fee of eighty-five dollars ($85).

(d) The fee for an
 autobroker’s endorsement to a dealer’s license is as follows:

(1) For the original endorsement, a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For the annual renewal of the endorsement, a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75).

(e) When the holder of a license for which a fee is provided in this section applies for special plates as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 11505 or subdivision (b) of Section 11714, the fee for the plates and the annual renewal of the plates is the prevailing vehicle registration fee as set forth in Section 9250 for the period for which the special plates are issued or renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 556, Sec. 3.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in amending Section 9262 in 2009 to increase the fee for the annual renewal of the license of a dealer and of a lessor-retailer to one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), that forty dollars ($40) of that fee shall, when appropriated, be utilized by the department for the investigation of those dealers and lessor-retailers who demonstrate the greatest potential for causing losses to consumers
 as shown by repeated consumer complaints, habitual violations of the requirements of their licenses, the issuance of a probationary license by the department, or a violation of other standards and criteria established by the department for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 556, Sec. 4.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

Any automobile dismantler who fails to comply with Section 11520, or any other person who fails to comply with Section 5500 or 11520, shall pay an investigation service fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1022, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

9265.

Upon application for duplicates or substitutes as permitted under this code, the following fees shall be paid: (a)For a duplicate certificate of ownership or registration cardor equipment identification card $15(b)For any duplicate license plates, except environmental license plates, or substitute plates, or equipment identification plate for the same vehicle $15

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.

The fee for a temporary permit issued under Section 5010 is one-tenth of the annual fees in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for each calendar month that the vehicle is to be operated in this state. There shall be no proration of fees for any fraction of a calendar month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.5.

The fee for a temporary permit issued under subdivision (b) of Section 9102.5 is one-tenth of the annual fees in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for each calendar month that the vehicle is to be operated in this state. There shall be no proration of fees for any fraction of a calendar month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 147, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9268.

In addition to any other registration fee and notwithstanding Section 9559, an additional fee of one dollar ($1) shall be collected upon the original registration of a motorcycle pursuant to Section 4150.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 887.)
-------------------------------------------

9269.

A licensed automobile dismantler who acquires, for the purpose of dismantling, a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, and who complies with Section 11520, is not required to pay fees or penalties that would otherwise be required if that vehicle were to be currently registered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1352, Sec. 7.   Effective September 27, 1990.   Applicable from July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 21 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

9271.

In addition to any other fees specified in this code, a fee sufficient to cover the department’s costs for the inspections performed pursuant to Section 5505 shall be charged to register a vehicle which has been declared a total loss salvage vehicle pursuant to Section 11515 or which has been reported to have been dismantled pursuant to Section 5500 or 11520.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Weight Fees [9400. - 9410.]

9400.

Except as provided in Section 9400.1, and in addition to any other registration fee, there shall be paid the fees set forth in this section for the registration of any commercial motor vehicle that operates with unladen weight. Weight fees for pickup trucks are calculated under this section. Whenever a camper is temporarily attached to a motor vehicle designed to transport property, the motor vehicle shall be subject to the fees imposed by this section. The camper shall be deemed to be a load, and fees imposed by this section upon the motor vehicle shall be based
 upon the unladen weight of the motor vehicle, exclusive of the camper.

(a) For any electric vehicle designed, used, or maintained as described in this section, fees shall be paid according to the following schedule:Unladen WeightFee Less than 6,000 lbs. $ 87 6,000 lbs. or more but less than 10,000 lbs. 26610,000 lbs. or more 358(b) For any motor vehicle having not more than two axles and designed, used, or maintained as described in this section, other than an electric vehicle, fees shall be paid according to the following schedule:Unladen WeightFee Less than 3,000 lbs. $ 8 3,000 lbs. to and including 4,000 lbs. 24 4,001 lbs. to and including 5,000 lbs. 80 5,001 lbs. to and including 6,000 lbs. 154 6,001 lbs. to and including 7,000 lbs. 204 7,001 lbs. to and including 8,000 lbs. 257 8,001 lbs. to and including 9,000 lbs. 308 9,001 lbs. to and including 10,000 lbs. 360(c) For any motor vehicle having three or more axles designed, used, or maintained as described in this section, other than an electric vehicle, fees shall be paid according to the following schedule:Unladen WeightFee 2,000 lbs. to and including 3,000 lbs. $ 43 3,001 lbs. to and including 4,000 lbs. 77 4,001 lbs. to and including 5,000 lbs. 154 5,001 lbs. to and including 6,000 lbs. 231 6,001 lbs. to and including 7,000 lbs. 308 7,001 lbs. to and including
 8,000 lbs. 385 8,001 lbs. to and including 9,000 lbs. 462 9,001 lbs. to and including 10,000 lbs. 539(d) This section is not applicable to any vehicle that is operated or moved over the highway exclusively for the purpose of historical exhibition or other similar noncommercial purpose.

(e) The fee changes effected by this section apply to (1) initial or original registration on or after January 1, 1995, and prior to December 31, 2001, of any commercial vehicle never before registered in this state and (2) to renewal of registration of any commercial vehicle whose registration expires on or after January 1, 1995, and prior to December 31, 2001.

(f) Commercial vehicles, other than those specified in Section 9400.1, with an initial registration or renewal of registration that is due on or after December 31, 2001, are subject to the payment of fees specified in this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 973, Sec. 3.5) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.1.

(a) (1) In addition to any other required fee, there shall be paid the fees set forth in this section for the registration of commercial motor vehicles operated either singly or in combination with a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more. Pickup truck and electric vehicle weight fees are not calculated under this section.

(2) The weight of a vehicle issued an identification plate pursuant to an application under Section 5014, and the weight of an implement of husbandry as defined in Section 36000, shall not be considered when calculating, pursuant to this section, the declared gross vehicle weight of a towing commercial motor vehicle that is
 owned and operated exclusively by a farmer or an employee of a farmer in the conduct of agricultural operations.

(3) Tow trucks that are utilized to render assistance to the motoring public or to tow or carry impounded vehicles shall pay fees in accordance with this section, except that the fee calculation shall be based only on the gross vehicle weight rating of the towing or carrying vehicle. Upon each initial or transfer application for registration of a tow truck described in this paragraph, the registered owner or lessee or that owner’s or lessee’s designee, shall certify to the department the gross vehicle weight rating of the tow truck:Gross Vehicle Weight RangeFee10,001–15,000 $ 25715,001–20,000 35320,001–26,000 43526,001–30,000 55230,001–35,000 64835,001–40,000 76140,001–45,000 83745,001–50,000 94850,001–54,999 1,03955,000–60,000 1,17360,001–65,000 1,28265,001–70,000 1,39870,001–75,000 1,65075,001–80,000 1,700(b) The fees specified in subdivision (a) apply to both of the following:

(1) An initial or original registration occurring on or after December 31, 2001, to December 30, 2003, inclusive, of a commercial motor vehicle operated either singly or in combination with a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more.

(2) The renewal of registration of a commercial motor vehicle operated either singly or in combination, with a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more for which registration expires on or after December 31, 2001, to December 30, 2003, inclusive.

(c) (1) For both an initial or original registration
 occurring on or after December 31, 2003, of a commercial motor vehicle operated either singly or in combination with a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more, and the renewal of registration of a commercial motor vehicle operated either singly or in combination, with a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more for which registration expires on or after December 31, 2003, there shall be paid fees as follows:Gross Vehicle Weight Range
Weight Code
Fee 
10,001–15,000A$ 332
15,001–20,000B 447
20,001–26,000C 546
26,001–30,000D 586
30,001–35,000E 801
35,001–40,000F 937
40,001–45,000G1,028
45,001–50,000H1,161
50,001–54,999I1,270
55,000–60,000J1,431
60,001–65,000K1,562
65,001–70,000L1,701
70,001–75,000M2,004
75,001–80,000N2,064
(2) For the purpose of obtaining “revenue neutrality” as described in Sections 1 and 59 of Senate Bill 2084 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session (Chapter 861 of the Statutes of 2000), the Director of Finance shall review the final 2003–04 Statement of Transactions of the State Highway Account. If that review indicates that the actual truck weight fee revenues deposited in the State Highway Account do not total at least seven hundred eighty-nine million dollars ($789,000,000), the Director of Finance shall instruct the department to adjust the schedule set forth in paragraph (1), but not to exceed the following fee amounts:Gross Vehicle Weight Range
Weight Code
Fee 
10,001–15,000A$ 354
15,001–20,000B 482
20,001–26,000C 591
26,001–30,000D 746
30,001–35,000E 874
35,001–40,000F1,024
40,001–45,000G1,125
45,001–50,000H1,272
50,001–54,999I1,393
55,000–60,000J1,571
60,001–65,000K1,716
65,001–70,000L1,870
70,001–75,000M2,204
75,001–80,000N2,271
(d) (1) In addition to the fees set forth in subdivision (a), a Cargo Theft Interdiction Program fee of three dollars ($3) shall be paid at the time of initial or original registration or renewal of registration of each motor vehicle subject to weight fees under this section.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to vehicles used or maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation or profit, and tow trucks.

(3) For vehicles registered under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4, the fee imposed under this subdivision
 shall be apportioned as required for registration fees under that article.

(4) Funds collected pursuant to the Cargo Theft Interdiction Program shall not be proportionately reduced for each month and shall be transferred to the Motor Carriers Safety Improvement Fund.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 42270 or any other provision of law, of the moneys collected by the department under this section, one hundred twenty-two dollars ($122) for each initial, original, and renewal registration shall be reported monthly to the Controller, and at the same time, deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. All other moneys collected by the department under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund, or directly to the credit of the Transportation Debt Service Fund as
 provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 9400.4, as applicable. One hundred twenty-two dollars ($122) of the fee imposed under this section shall not be proportionately reduced for each month. For vehicles registered under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4, the fee shall be apportioned as required for registration under that article.

(f) (1) The department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall design and make available a set of distinctive weight decals that reflect the declared gross combined weight or gross operating weight reported to the department at the time of initial registration, registration renewal, or when a weight change is reported to the department pursuant to Section 9406.1. A new decal shall be issued on each renewal or when the weight is changed pursuant to Section 9406.1. The decal for a tow truck that is subject to this section
 shall reflect the gross vehicle weight rating or weight code.

(2) The department may charge a fee, not to exceed ten dollars ($10), for the department’s actual cost of producing and issuing each set of decals issued under paragraph (1).

(3) The weight decal shall be in sharp contrast to the background and shall be of a size, shape, and color that is readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 50 feet.

(4) Each vehicle subject to this section shall display the weight decal on both the right and left sides of the vehicle.

(5) A person may not display upon a vehicle a decal issued pursuant to this subdivision that does not reflect the declared weight reported to the department.

(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) or any other provision of law, the moneys collected by the department under this subdivision shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(7) This subdivision shall apply to vehicles subject to this section at the time of an initial registration, registration renewal, or reported weight change that occurs on or after July 1, 2004.

(8) The following shall apply to vehicles registered under the permanent fleet registration program pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301) of Chapter 1:

(A) The department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall distinguish the weight decals issued to permanent fleet registration vehicles from those issued to other
 vehicles.

(B) The department shall issue the distinguishable weight decals only to the following:

(i) A permanent fleet registration vehicle that is registered with the department on January 1, 2005.

(ii) On and after January 1, 2005, a vehicle for which the department has an application for initial registration as a permanent fleet registration vehicle.

(iii) On and after January 1, 2005, a permanent fleet registration vehicle that has a weight change pursuant to Section 9406.1.

(C) The weight decal issued under this paragraph shall comply with the applicable provisions of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 13.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.3.

(a) In order to ensure that Chapter 973 of the Statutes of 2000 is implemented as originally intended by the Legislature, the department may not assess the Cargo Theft Interdiction Program fee upon any commercial motor vehicle that has a declared gross vehicle weight of less than 10,001 pounds.

(b) The department shall issue refunds of, or credits for, any Cargo Theft Interdiction Program fee that is assessed upon a vehicle that does not meet the minimum weights described in
 Section 9400.1 or is a pickup truck or an electric vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 349.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.4.

Weight fee revenue deposited into the State Highway Account pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 9400.1 and subdivision (a) of Section 42205 net of amounts appropriated for other purposes pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42205, and weight fee revenues deposited directly into the Transportation Debt Service Fund pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 9400.1 and subdivision (a) of Section 42205, as applicable, shall be used as follows:

(a) For the 2010–11 fiscal year, seven hundred fifty-six million three hundred ninety-six thousand dollars ($756,396,000) is hereby appropriated from weight fee revenues in the State Highway Account for transfer to the General Fund as transportation bond debt service reimbursement and loans as follows:

(1) The Controller shall transfer all weight fee revenues deposited into the State Highway Account in any month to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for transfer to the General Fund as reimbursement for debt service costs until all of the debt service paid on transportation bonds for projects that the Director of Finance indicates qualify for reimbursement as provided for in Section 16965 of the Government Code have been reimbursed.

(2) After the Director of Finance has notified the Controller that all debt service costs for the 2010–11 fiscal year have been reimbursed, the Controller shall transfer any remaining monthly weight fee revenues in the State Highway Account to the General Fund as a loan until the full amount appropriated in this subdivision has been transferred to the General Fund. The Director of Finance may repay any remaining portion of the outstanding balance of this
 loan in any year in which the Director of Finance determines the funds are needed to reimburse the General Fund for current year transportation bond debt service or to redeem or retire those bonds, pursuant to Section 16774 of the Government Code, maturing in a subsequent fiscal year, provided that the loans shall be repaid no later than June 30, 2021. All funds loaned pursuant to this section, upon repayment to the State Highway Account, shall be immediately transferred by the Controller to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for use pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code.

(3) By June 15, 2011, the Director of Finance in consultation with the Treasurer shall notify the Controller regarding the final amount of debt service paid from the General Fund during the 2010–11 fiscal year pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code and shall direct the Controller to reverse and adjust any transfers made as debt service reimbursements or
 loans so that a maximum amount of transfers are made for debt service reimbursements and with any loan amounts limited to the difference between this amount and the total amount appropriated in this subdivision. The total amount of weight fee revenues transferred from the State Highway Account for the 2010–11 fiscal year shall not be greater than the total amount of weight fee revenues deposited into the State Highway Account for that year.

(4) With respect to transfers or portions of transfers that cannot be made in any given month if weight fee revenues are insufficient, the first weight fee revenues available in the following month or months shall be used to complete the transfers for the previous month or months before making additional transfers for later months.

(b) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, all revenue generated from weight fees in the State Highway Account, as
 determined by Sections 9400.1 and 42205, excluding an amount equal to the loan of forty-three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($43,700,000) authorized pursuant to Item 2660-013-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2011, is hereby appropriated for transfer to the General Fund as debt service reimbursement and loans as follows:

(1) The Controller shall transfer all weight fee revenues deposited into the State Highway Account in any month to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for transfer to the General Fund as reimbursement for debt service costs until all of the debt service paid on transportation bonds for projects that the Director of Finance indicates qualify for reimbursement as provided for in Section 16965 of the Government Code have been reimbursed.

(2) After the Director of Finance has notified the Controller that all debt service costs for the 2011–12 fiscal
 year have been reimbursed, the Controller shall transfer any remaining weight fee revenues for that fiscal year in the State Highway Account to the General Fund as a loan until all weight fee revenues for that fiscal year appropriated in this subdivision have been transferred to the General Fund, excluding forty-two million dollars ($42,000,000), which shall be transferred to the General Fund as a loan on July 1, 2012. The Director of Finance may repay any portion of the balance of this loan in any year in which the Director of Finance determines the funds are needed to reimburse the General Fund for current year transportation bond debt service or to redeem or retire those bonds, pursuant to Section 16774 of the Government Code, maturing in a subsequent year, provided that the loans shall be repaid no later than June 30, 2021. All funds loaned pursuant to this section, upon repayment to the State Highway Account, shall be immediately transferred by the Controller to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for
 use pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code.

(3) By June 15, 2012, the Director of Finance in consultation with the Treasurer shall notify the Controller regarding the final amount of debt service paid from the General Fund during the 2011–12 fiscal year pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code and shall direct the Controller to reverse and adjust any transfers made as debt service reimbursements or loans so that a maximum amount of transfers are made for debt service reimbursements and with any loan amounts limited to the difference between this amount and the total amount appropriated in this subdivision. The total amount of weight fee revenues transferred from the State Highway Account for the 2011–12 fiscal year shall not be greater than the total amount of weight fee revenues deposited into the State Highway Account in that year.

(4) With respect to transfers
 or portions of transfers that cannot be made in any given month if weight fee revenues are insufficient, the first weight fee revenues available in the following month or months shall be used to complete the transfers for the previous month or months before making additional transfers for later months.

(c) (1) (A) Until the month of first issuance of designated bonds, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16773 of the Government Code, and at any time thereafter that a Treasurer’s certification pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16965 of the Government Code applies, all weight fee revenues subject to this section in any month shall be transferred from the State Highway Account to the Transportation Debt Service Fund.

(B) Except as provided in paragraph (3), or when subparagraph (A) applies
 pursuant to a Treasurer’s certification, upon the first issuance of designated bonds, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16773 of the Government Code, starting in the month following that first issuance, all weight fee revenues received by the Controller from the first day through the 14th day of every month shall be transferred from the State Highway Account to the Transportation Debt Service Fund.

(C) All funds transferred pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) are hereby appropriated for transfer to the General Fund by the Controller as reimbursement for debt service costs paid with respect to eligible bonds described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16965 of the Government Code, until all debt service that the Director of Finance indicates qualifies for reimbursement as provided for in subdivision (d), (e), or (f) of Section 16965 of the Government Code has been reimbursed, or to redeem or retire bonds, pursuant to
 Section 16774 of the Government Code, as referenced in subdivision (d), (e), or (f) of Section 16965 of the Government Code, that are maturing in a subsequent year. After the Director of Finance has notified the Controller that all debt service costs for the fiscal year have been reimbursed, the Controller shall transfer any remaining revenue generated from weight fees subject to this section for that fiscal year in the State Highway Account to the General Fund as a loan. The Director of Finance may repay any portion of the balance of this loan in any year in which the Director of Finance determines that the funds are needed to reimburse the General Fund for current or future year transportation bond debt service or to redeem or retire those bonds pursuant to Section 16774 of the Government Code, maturing in a future fiscal year, provided that the loans shall be repaid no later than June 30, 2021. All funds loaned pursuant to this section, upon repayment to the State Highway Account, shall be immediately
 transferred by the Controller to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for use pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code. By June 15 of each year, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer, shall notify the Controller regarding the final amount of debt service paid from the General Fund during that fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (d), (e), or (f) of Section 16965 of the Government Code and shall direct the Controller to reverse or adjust any transfers made as debt service reimbursements or loans so that a maximum amount of transfers are made for debt service reimbursements and with any loan amounts limited to the difference between this amount and the total amount of revenue for that fiscal year generated from weight fees, as determined by Sections 9400.1 and 42205. The total amount of weight fee revenues transferred from the State Highway Account in any fiscal year shall not be greater than the total amount of weight fee revenues deposited into the State Highway Account in that
 year.

(2) Starting in the month following the first issuance of any designated bonds, unless a Treasurer’s certification pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16965 of the Government Code applies, all weight fee revenues subject to this section that are received by the Controller from the 15th day of every month, or the first business day thereafter if not a business day, through the last day of the month shall be deposited directly in the Transportation Debt Service Fund and are hereby appropriated for transfer as follows:

(A) First, to the Transportation Bond Direct Payment Account as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 16965 of the Government Code, to provide for payment of debt service with respect to designated bonds.

(B) Thereafter, as provided in subparagraph (C) of
 paragraph (1).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if by the last day of a month the transfer for that month relating to designated bonds required by the Treasurer’s certificate described in subdivision (b) of Section 16965 of the Government Code has not been made due to insufficient weight fee revenue, weight fee revenue shall continue to be transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) beginning with the first day of the subsequent month and continuing every day until such time as sufficient revenue for full compliance with the certificate has been transferred.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), with respect to any transfers or portions of transfers that cannot be made in any given month if weight fee revenues are insufficient, the first weight fee revenues available in the following month or months shall be used to complete the transfers for the
 previous month or months before making additional transfers for later months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 32, Sec. 12.   (SB 87)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for restrictions in existence on June 1, 1989, and except as provided in subdivision (d), so long as any increases in the weight fees required by Section 9400, as enacted by Assembly Bill 471 of the 1989–90 Regular Session, remain in effect, no local agency located within an urbanized area within a county which is required to prepare a congestion management plan pursuant to Section 65089 of the Government Code may restrict the hours of operation on any street or highway which is otherwise open to truck use unless the local agency determines that the restriction is consistent with
 the adopted congestion management plan and is coordinated with adjacent local agencies so as to not unreasonably interfere with truck operations. 

(b) If an inconsistency in access occurs between cities and counties, the inconsistent access provisions of the congestion management plan may be appealed to the California Transportation Commission. The commission shall review the inconsistent access plan and make a finding within 90 days of the appeal being filed. If the commission fails to make a finding within 90 days, the Director of Transportation shall review the issue and make a finding within 30 days.

(c) The access provisions of the congestion management plan shall not go into effect while an appeal is being made. If the commission makes a finding of inconsistency, the access provisions of the congestion management plan shall not become operative.

(d) (1) This section does not apply to Los Angeles County if the City of Los Angeles establishes restrictions on the hours of operation on any street or highway which is otherwise open to truck use.

(2) If the City of Los Angeles establishes restrictions under paragraph (1) and any other city in the County of Los Angeles establishes restrictions on the hours of operation on any street or highway which is otherwise open to truck use, the restrictions in that other city shall conform to the restrictions imposed by the City of Los Angeles, except that the other city may appeal noncomforming restrictions to the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) for a determination as to whether a variance from this paragraph should be granted.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that, because of unique and
 special traffic congestion problems in the County of Los Angeles and in the City of Los Angeles, the general provisions of this section cannot be made applicable to that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1337, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the voters approve Senate Constitutional Amendment 1 of the 1989–90 Regular Session, no local agency may impose a tax, permit fee, or other charge for the privilege of using its streets or highways, other than a permit fee for extra legal loads, after December 31, 1990, unless the local agency had imposed the fee prior to June 1, 1989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1337, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9401.

(a) Motor vehicles manufactured in or prior to 1936, are exempted from the payment of the weight fees provided for in Section 9400.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who owns and operates a commercial vehicle manufactured in or prior to 1936 which is registered to such person, may pay the appropriate weight fees, and the department shall issue license plates of the same type as are issued to vehicles which are required to pay weight fees for such vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

(a) Station wagons, except those used in the transportation of passengers for hire, are exempted from the payment of weight fees provided for in Section 9400.

Any provision of this code notwithstanding, any person (1) who is bona fide engaged in a business and who owns and operates a station wagon which is registered in the name of such business, or (2) who is bona fide engaged in a business as an employee and who is required by such employment to own and operate a station wagon, which is registered to such person, may pay the appropriate weight fees, and the department
 shall issue license plates of the same type as are issued to vehicles which are required to pay weight fees.

(b) For purposes of this section, “engaged in a business” means engaged in a bona fide trade, business,, commerce, or in a profession in which the measurement of land, construction quantities, or the dimension of structures, is a function authorized to be performed by the license issued for such profession, but does not include being engaged in any other type of profession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

Agricultural water-well boring rigs are exempt from the fees provided in Section 9400.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9406.

Alterations or additions to registered vehicles for which fees have been paid under Section 9400 or 9400.1 placing the vehicles in weight fee classifications under Section 9400 or 9400.1 greater than the weight fees previously paid shall be reported to the department and at the same time the difference between the weight fee previously paid, reduced as provided in Section 9407, and the greater weight fee, reduced as provided in Section 9407, shall be paid to the department upon the operation of the vehicles in the greater weight fee
 classification under Section 9400 or 9400.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 51.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

9406.1.
